Utah statutes.
53-1-118.   Public Safety Honoring Heroes Restricted Account -- Creation -- Funding -- Distribution of funds by the commissioner.

(1)  There is created in the General Fund a restricted account known as the Public Safety Honoring Heroes Restricted Account.

(2)  The account shall be funded by:

(a)  contributions deposited into the Public Safety Honoring Heroes Restricted Account in accordance with Section 41-1a-422;

(b)  private contributions; and

(c)  donations or grants from public or private entities.

(3)  The Legislature shall appropriate money in the account to the commissioner.

(4)  The commissioner shall distribute the funds to one or more charitable organizations that:

(a)  qualify as being tax exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and

(b)  have as a primary part of their mission to support the families of fallen Utah Highway Patrol troopers and other Department of Public Safety employees.

(5)  The commissioner may only consider proposals that are:

(a)  proposed by a charitable organization under Subsection (4); and

(b)  designed to support families of fallen Utah Highway Patrol troopers and other Department of Public Safety employees.

(6) (a)  An organization described in Subsection (4) may apply to the commissioner to receive a distribution in accordance with Subsection (4).

(b)  An organization that receives a distribution from the commissioner in accordance with Subsection (4) shall expend the distribution only to support the families of fallen Utah Highway Patrol troopers and other Department of Public Safety employees.

(7)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commissioner shall make rules providing procedures for an organization to apply to receive funds under this section.

